Indiana, session 2026, SB68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-41-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18. Graduate Programs in Mental or Behavioral
Health
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to Ivy Tech Community
College or Vincennes University.
Sec. 2. Each state educational institution that offers a two (2)
year graduate degree program in mental or behavioral health shall
evaluate the graduate degree program to determine the feasibility,
if any, of providing the graduate degree program in a specifically
structured manner to allow a full-time student to complete the
graduate degree within:
(1) one (1) year; or
(2) five (5) years if the graduate degree program is combined
with a baccalaureate degree program.
Sec. 3. Not later than July 1, 2028, each state educational
2026 IN 68—LS 6323/DI 110


institution shall offer at least one (1) graduate degree program in
one (1) or more of the following disciplines that is specifically
structured to allow a full-time student to complete the graduate
degree as described in section 2(1) or 2(2) of this chapter:
(1) Social work.
(2) Clinical addiction counseling.
(3) Mental health counseling.
(4) Marriage and family therapy.
(5) School counseling.
(6) Counseling.
(7) Psychology.
Sec. 4. (a) Not later than November 1, 2028, each state
educational institution shall report to the commission for higher
education, in a form prescribed by the commission for higher
education, information regarding each graduate degree program
that the state educational institution is offering in compliance with
section 3 of this chapter.
(b) Not later than November 1, 2032, each state educational
institution shall report to the commission for higher education, in
a form prescribed by the commission for higher education, the
following information for each graduate degree program described
in section 3 of this chapter offered by the state educational
institution:
(1) For each of the immediately preceding four (4) academic
years, a description of each graduate degree program.
(2) The estimated student cost savings of the graduate degree
program.
(3) For a graduate degree program that allows completion
within one (1) year, the number of students:
(A) enrolled in the graduate degree program; and
(B) who completed the graduate degree program on time;
for each of the immediately preceding four (4) academic
years.
(4) For a graduate degree program combined with a
baccalaureate degree program that allows for completion
within five (5) years, the number of students:
(A) enrolled in the graduate degree program; and
(B) who completed or are on track to complete the
graduate degree program on time;
for each of the immediately preceding four (4) academic
years.
(5) Any other information requested by the commission for
2026 IN 68—LS 6323/DI 110


higher education.
(c) The commission for higher education shall post the reports
submitted under this section on the commission for higher
education's website.
Sec. 5. The commission for higher education may consider
graduate degrees described in section 3 of this chapter completed
within the time frame described in section 2 of this chapter for the
purposes of the higher educational operating funding outcomes
based formula created by the commission for higher education
under IC 21-18-16-2.
Sec. 6. This chapter expires July 1, 2033.
2026 IN 68—LS 6323/DI 110